Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.370

Authorization to conduct affairs in the state—Right of state to terminate registration.

Upon the filing of the foreign registration statement by the secretary of state, the corporation shall be authorized to conduct affairs in this state for those purposes set forth in its application subject to the right of the state to terminate the registration as provided in RCW 23.95.550.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4121; 1982 c 35 s 145; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 74.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.